Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1207.01
Department
of Health and Human Services; caseloads report; contents.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall annually provide
a report to the Legislature and Governor outlining the caseloads of child
protective services, the factors considered in their establishment, and the
fiscal resources necessary for their maintenance. The report submitted to
the Legislature shall be submitted electronically. For 2012, 2013, and 2014,
the department shall also provide electronically the
report to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature on or
before September 15. Such report shall include:

(1) A comparison of caseloads established by the department
with the workload standards recommended by national child welfare organizations
along with the amount of fiscal resources necessary to maintain such caseloads
in Nebraska;

(2)(a) The number of child welfare case managers employed
by the State of Nebraska and child welfare services workers, providing services
directly to children and families, who are under contract with the State of
Nebraska or employed by a private entity under contract with the State of
Nebraska and (b) statistics on the average length of employment in such positions,
statewide and by service area designated pursuant to section 81-3116;

(3)(a) The average caseload of child welfare case managers
employed by the State of Nebraska and child welfare services workers, providing
services directly to children and families, who are under contract with the
State of Nebraska or employed by a private entity under contract with the
State of Nebraska and (b) the outcomes of such cases, including the number
of children reunited with their families, children adopted, children in guardianships,
placement of children with relatives, and other permanent resolutions established,
statewide and by service area designated pursuant to section 81-3116; and

(4) The average cost of training child welfare case managers
employed by the State of Nebraska and child welfare services workers, providing
child welfare services directly to children and families, who are under contract
with the State of Nebraska or employed by a private entity under contract
with the State of Nebraska, statewide and by service area as designated pursuant
to section 81-3116.

Laws 1990, LB 720, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 349;

Laws 2005, LB 264, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 281;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 96;

Laws 2012, LB1160, § 14;

Laws 2013, LB222, § 22.